Tables/Contraction/zh-tw-polyphone.cti
always 差役 12-2456-3-16-5
always 差遣 12-2456-3-245-2345-4
always 差點 12-345-5-145-2345-4
always 巴答 135-345-3-145-345-3
always 巷子 15-46-5-125-156-1
always 市長 24-156-5-1-1346-4
always 布匹 135-34-5-1234-16-4
always 帖子 124-346-4-125-156-1
always 師長 24-156-3-1-1346-4
always 帽子 134-146-5-125-156-1
always 幌子 1235-456-4-125-156-1
always 幫子 135-1346-3-125-156-1
always 干將 13-1236-3-13-46-5
always 年假 1345-2345-2-13-23456-5
always 年少 1345-2345-2-24-146-5
always 年長 1345-2345-2-1-1346-4
always 幹嘛 13-1236-5-134-345-2
always 幹麼 13-1236-5-134-345-2
always 幾乎 13-16-3-1235-34-3
always 床鋪 12-456-2-1234-34-5
always 应用 13456-5-235-5
always 底子 145-16-4-125-156-1
always 店鋪 145-2345-5-1234-34-5
always 度假 145-34-5-13-23456-5
always 庭長 124-13456-2-1-1346-4
always 廚子 12-34-2-125-156-1
always 廠長 12-1346-4-1-1346-4
always 廳長 124-13456-3-1-1346-4
always 建都 13-2345-5-145-34-3
always 弦樂 15-2345-2-236-5
always 強制 245-46-4-1-156-5
always 強占 245-46-4-1-1236-5
always 強將 245-46-2-13-46-5
always 強幹 245-46-4-13-1236-5
always 強橫 245-46-2-1235-1356-5
always 強求 245-46-4-245-234-2
always 強記 245-46-4-13-16-5
always 彈丸 145-1236-5-12456-2
always 彈子 145-1236-5-125-156-1
always 彈弓 145-1236-5-13-12346-3
always 彈無 145-1236-5-34-2
always 彈珠 145-1236-5-1-34-3
always 彈痕 145-1236-5-1235-136-2
always 彈盡 145-1236-5-13-1456-5
always 彈藥 145-1236-5-246-5
always 彈道 145-1236-5-145-146-5
always 彈鋏 145-1236-5-13-23456-2
always 彈雨 145-1236-5-1256-4
always 彈頭 145-1236-5-124-12356-2
always 彌撒 134-16-2-15-345-3
always 彎曲 12456-3-245-1256-3
always 影子 13456-4-125-156-1
always 彷徨 1234-1346-2-1235-456-2
always 往還 456-4-1235-12456-2
always 征伐 1-1356-3-12345-345-3
always 徘徊 1234-2456-2-1235-2356-2
always 德行 145-2346-2-15-13456-5
always 必得 135-16-5-145-356-4
always 必應 135-16-5-13456-5
always 忖度 245-123456-4-145-25-5
always 忠告 1-12346-3-13-34-5
always 怎么 125-136-4-134-2346-1
always 怒號 1345-34-5-1235-146-2
always 思汗 15-156-3-1235-1236-2
always 思量 15-156-3-14-46-2
always 急難 13-16-2-1345-1236-5
always 性子 15-13456-5-125-156-1
always 怯場 245-236-5-12-1346-4
always 怯懦 245-236-5-1345-25-5
always 恐嚇 123-12346-4-1235-2346-5
always 恫嚇 145-12346-5-1235-2346-5
always 恰當 245-23456-5-145-1346-5
always 患難 1235-12456-5-1345-1236-5
always 悶悶 134-136-5-134-136-5
always 情分 245-13456-2-12345-136-5
always 惡勞 34-5-14-146-2
always 惡少 2346-5-24-146-5
always 愛好 2456-5-1235-146-5
always 感應 13-1236-4-13456-5
always 慰勞 1246-5-14-146-5
always 憎惡 125-1356-3-34-5
always 應付 13456-5-12345-34-5
always 應允 13456-5-256-4
always 應命 13456-5-134-13456-5
always 應和 13456-5-1235-2346-2
always 應對 13456-5-145-1246-5
always 應徵 13456-5-1-1356-3
always 應接 13456-5-13-346-3
always 應時 13456-5-24-156-2
always 應景 13456-5-13-13456-4
always 應求 13456-5-245-234-2
always 應用 13456-5-235-5
always 應考 13456-5-123-146-4
always 應聲 13456-5-24-1356-3
always 應許 13456-5-15-1256-4
always 應試 13456-5-24-156-5
always 應變 13456-5-135-2345-5
always 應運 13456-5-256-5
always 應邀 13456-5-246-3
always 應酬 13456-5-12-12356-2
always 應驗 13456-5-2345-5
always 懊喪 146-5-15-1346-5
always 懊悔 146-5-1235-1246-4
always 懊惱 146-5-1345-146-4
always 懲處 12-1356-2-12-34-4
always 懵懂 134-1356-4-145-12346-4
always 懶散 14-1236-4-15-1236-4
always 成分 12-1356-2-12345-136-5
always 成都 12-1356-2-145-34-3
always 成長 12-1356-2-1-1346-4
always 戰將 1-1236-5-13-46-5
always 戲子 15-16-5-125-156-1
always 戲謔 15-16-5-1345-236-5
always 戶長 1235-34-5-1-1346-4
always 房子 12345-1346-2-125-156-1
always 所著 15-25-4-1-34-5
always 所長 15-25-4-1-1346-4
always 扁擔 135-2345-4-145-1236-5
always 扁舟 1234-2345-3-1-12356-3
always 扁鑽 135-2345-4-125-12456-5
always 扇子 24-1236-5-125-156-1
always 手相 24-12356-4-15-46-5
always 扎實 1-345-3-24-156-2
always 扎手 1-345-3-24-12356-4
always 扎根 1-345-3-13-136-3
always 扎眼 1-345-3-2345-4
always 扎針 1-345-3-1-136-3
always 打盹 145-345-4-145-123456-4
always 扣子 123-12356-5-125-156-1
always 扭曲 1345-234-4-245-1256-3
always 扮相 135-1236-5-15-46-5
always 找著 1-146-4-1-146-2
always 抄沒 12-146-3-134-126-5
always 投降 124-12356-2-15-46-2
always 抹煞 134-126-4-24-345-3
always 抽空 12-12356-3-123-12346-5
always 拍子 1234-2456-3-125-156-1
always 拔都 135-345-2-145-34-3
always 拗口 246-5-123-12356-4
always 拘泥 13-1256-3-1345-16-5
always 拙著 1-25-2-1-34-5
always 指摘 1-156-4-1-2346-2
always 挑剔 124-246-3-124-16-5
always 挑弄 124-246-4-1345-12346-5
always 挑戰 124-246-4-1-1236-5
always 挑撥 124-246-4-135-126-3
always 挑擔 124-246-3-145-1236-5
always 挑燈 124-246-4-145-1356-3
always 挑逗 124-246-4-145-12356-5
always 挑釁 124-246-4-15-1456-5
always 振臂 1-136-5-135-16-5
always 掃帚 15-146-5-1-12356-4
always 排比 1234-2456-2-135-16-5
always 排行 1234-2456-2-1235-1346-2
always 排長 1234-2456-2-1-1346-4
always 掙錢 1-1356-5-245-2345-2
always 探子 124-1236-5-125-156-1
always 接應 13-346-3-13456-5
always 接縫 13-346-3-12345-1356-5
always 推磨 124-1246-3-134-126-5
always 掩沒 2345-4-134-126-5
always 換行 1235-12456-5-1235-1346-2
always 揣度 12-2356-4-145-25-5
always 揩油 123-2456-3-234-2
always 揭櫫 13-346-2-1-34-3
always 搖晃 246-2-1235-456-5
always 搪塞 124-1346-2-15-2346-5
always 摟錢 14-12356-3-245-2345-2
always 撇子 1234-346-4-125-156-1
always 撒但 15-345-3-145-1236-5
always 撒嬌 15-345-3-13-246-3
always 撒尿 15-345-3-1345-246-5
always 撒手 15-345-3-24-12356-4
always 撒腿 15-345-3-124-1246-4
always 撒謊 15-345-3-1235-456-4
always 撒賴 15-345-3-14-2456-5
always 撒野 15-345-3-346-4
always 撒開 15-345-3-123-2456-3
always 播映 135-126-3-13456-5
always 播音 135-126-3-1456-3
always 操行 245-146-3-15-13456-5
always 擔子 145-1236-5-125-156-1
always 擲還 1-156-2-1235-12456-2
always 攘夷 1245-1346-2-16-2
always 攘奪 1245-1346-2-145-25-2
always 攤子 124-1236-3-125-156-1
always 攤還 124-1236-3-1235-12456-2
always 攪和 13-246-4-1235-25-5
always 收藏 24-12356-3-245-1346-2
always 改行 13-2456-4-1235-1346-2
always 放假 12345-1346-5-13-23456-5
always 效應 15-246-5-13456-5
always 救難 13-234-5-1345-1236-5
always 敗興 135-2456-5-15-13456-5
always 散光 15-1236-4-13-456-3
always 散兵 15-1236-4-135-13456-3
always 散文 15-1236-4-123456-2
always 散曲 15-1236-4-245-1256-4
always 散沙 15-1236-4-24-345-3
always 數一 24-34-4-16-3
always 數不 24-34-4-135-34-5
always 數二 24-34-4-156-5
always 數典 24-34-4-145-2345-4
always 數數 24-34-4-24-34-5
always 數落 24-34-4-14-25-5
always 數說 24-34-4-24-25-3
always 數錢 24-34-4-245-2345-2
always 文過 123456-5-13-25-5
always 文飾 123456-5-24-156-5
always 斗量 145-12356-4-14-46-2
always 料中 14-246-5-1-12346-5
always 料子 14-246-5-125-156-1
always 斧子 12345-34-4-125-156-1
always 旅長 14-1256-4-1-1346-4
always 旋風 15-45-5-12345-1356-3
always 族長 125-34-2-1-1346-4
always 旗子 245-16-2-125-156-1
always 日子 1245-156-5-125-156-1
always 日暈 1245-156-5-256-5
always 日沒 1245-156-5-134-126-5
always 易傳 16-5-1-12456-5
always 星宿 15-13456-3-15-234-5
always 星相 15-13456-3-15-46-5
always 春假 12-123456-3-13-23456-5
always 昭著 1-146-3-1-34-5
always 晁錯 12-146-2-245-25-5
always 晃腦 1235-456-5-1345-146-4
always 晃蕩 1235-456-5-145-1346-5
always 暇給 15-23456-2-13-16-4
always 暑假 24-34-4-13-23456-5
always 暖和 1345-12456-4-1235-25-1
always 暴露 1234-34-5-14-34-5
always 曲子 245-1256-4-125-156-1
always 曲尺 245-1256-3-12-156-4
always 曲度 245-1256-3-145-34-5
always 曲折 245-1256-3-1-2346-2
always 曲曲 245-1256-3-245-1256-3
always 曲沃 245-1256-3-25-5
always 曲直 245-1256-3-1-156-2
always 曲線 245-1256-3-15-2345-5
always 曲解 245-1256-3-13-346-4
always 曲阜 245-1256-3-12345-34-5
always 更事 13-1356-3-24-156-5
always 更動 13-1356-3-145-12346-5
always 更名 13-1356-3-134-13456-2
always 更張 13-1356-3-1-1346-3
always 更得 13-1356-5-145-356-4
always 更換 13-1356-3-1235-12456-5
always 更改 13-1356-3-13-2456-4
always 更新 13-1356-3-15-1456-3
always 更易 13-1356-3-16-5
always 更替 13-1356-3-124-16-5
always 更正 13-1356-3-1-1356-5
always 更生 13-1356-3-24-1356-3
always 更號 13-1356-3-1235-146-5
always 更衣 13-1356-3-16-3
always 更迭 13-1356-3-145-346-2
always 書卷 24-34-3-13-45-5
always 曹參 245-146-2-24-136-3
always 曾參 125-1356-3-24-136-3
always 曾子 125-1356-3-125-156-4
always 曾孫 125-1356-3-15-123456-3
always 曾氏 125-1356-3-24-156-5
always 曾祖 125-1356-3-125-34-4
always 曾鞏 125-1356-3-13-12346-4
always 會兒 1235-1246-4-156-3
always 會稽 13-1246-5-13-16-3
always 會計 123-2356-5-13-16-5
always 會長 1235-1246-5-1-1346-4
always 月子 236-5-125-156-1
always 月暈 236-5-256-5
always 月累 236-5-14-356-4
always 有分 234-4-12345-136-5
always 有朝 234-4-1-146-3
always 服帖 12345-34-2-124-346-3
always 朝三 1-146-3-15-1236-3
always 朝不 1-146-3-135-34-5
always 朝令 1-146-3-14-13456-5
always 朝夕 1-146-3-15-16-5
always 朝曦 1-146-3-15-16-3
always 朝會 1-146-3-1235-1246-5
always 朝朝 1-146-3-1-146-3
always 朝氣 1-146-3-245-16-5
always 朝發 1-146-3-12345-345-3
always 朝秦 1-146-3-245-1456-2
always 朝陽 1-146-3-46-2
always 朝露 1-146-3-14-34-5
always 期年 13-16-3-1345-2345-2
always 期月 13-16-3-236-5
always 期服 13-16-3-12345-34-2
always 木塞 134-34-5-15-2456-3
always 未了 1246-5-14-246-4
always 末了 134-126-5-14-246-4
always 本分 135-136-4-12345-136-5
always 本子 135-136-4-125-156-1
always 本行 135-136-4-1235-1346-2
always 李子 14-16-4-125-156-1
always 村子 245-123456-3-125-156-1
always 村長 245-123456-3-1-1346-4
always 杯子 135-356-3-125-156-1
always 松濤 15-12346-3-124-146-3
always 果子 13-25-4-125-156-1
always 枯萎 123-34-3-1246-3
always 架子 13-23456-5-125-156-1
always 柚子 234-5-125-156-1
always 查勘 12-345-2-123-1236-5
always 柱子 1-34-5-125-156-1
always 柺子 13-2356-4-125-156-1
always 柿子 24-156-5-125-156-1
always 栓塞 24-12456-3-15-2456-3
always 栓子 24-12456-3-125-156-1
always 校勘 13-246-5-123-1236-3
always 校對 13-246-5-145-1246-5
always 校正 13-246-5-1-1356-5
always 校準 13-246-5-1-123456-4
always 校訂 13-246-5-145-13456-5
always 校長 15-246-5-1-1346-4
always 校閱 13-246-5-236-5
always 格子 13-2346-2-125-156-1
always 栽種 125-2456-3-1-12346-5
always 桃子 124-146-2-125-156-1
always 框子 123-456-3-125-156-1
always 案卷 1236-5-13-45-5
always 案子 1236-5-125-156-1
always 桌子 1-25-3-125-156-1
always 桶子 124-12346-4-125-156-1
always 桿子 13-1236-4-125-156-1
always 梅子 134-356-2-125-156-1
always 梆子 135-1346-3-125-156-1
always 梗塞 13-1356-4-15-2346-5
always 條子 124-246-2-125-156-1
always 梯子 124-16-3-125-156-1
always 梳子 24-34-3-125-156-1
always 棍子 13-123456-5-125-156-1
always 棒喝 135-1346-5-1235-2346-5
always 棒子 135-1346-5-125-156-1
always 棚子 1234-1356-2-125-156-1
always 椅子 16-4-125-156-1
always 椰子 346-2-125-156-1
always 楔子 15-346-5-125-156-1
always 榴彈 14-234-2-145-1236-5
always 槓子 13-1346-5-125-156-1
always 樂劇 236-5-13-1256-5
always 樂器 236-5-245-16-5
always 樂團 236-5-124-12456-2
always 樂壇 236-5-124-1236-2
always 樂官 236-5-13-12456-3
always 樂師 236-5-24-156-3
always 樂府 236-5-12345-34-4
always 樂手 236-5-24-12356-4
always 樂曲 236-5-245-1256-4
always 樂段 236-5-145-12456-5
always 樂水 246-5-24-1246-4
always 樂派 236-5-1234-2456-5
always 樂理 236-5-14-16-4
always 樂章 236-5-1-1346-3
always 樂籍 236-5-13-16-2
always 樂譜 236-5-1234-34-4
always 樂迷 236-5-134-16-2
always 樂隊 236-5-145-1246-5
always 樂音 236-5-1456-3
always 樂風 236-5-12345-1356-3
always 樓子 14-12356-2-125-156-1
always 模子 134-126-2-125-156-1
always 模樣 134-34-2-46-5
always 樣子 46-5-125-156-1
always 橘子 13-1256-2-125-156-1
always 橫暴 1235-1356-5-135-146-5
always 橫死 1235-1356-5-15-156-4
always 橫禍 1235-1356-5-1235-25-5
always 橫肉 1235-1356-5-1245-12356-5
always 橫行 1235-1356-5-15-13456-2
always 橫財 1235-1356-5-245-2456-2
always 櫃子 13-1246-5-125-156-1
always 櫛比 13-346-2-135-16-5
always 次長 245-156-5-1-1346-4
always 欣羡 15-1456-3-15-2345-5
always 欸乃 2456-4-1345-2456-4
always 欽差 245-1456-3-12-2456-3
always 款子 123-12456-4-125-156-1
always 正中 1-1356-5-1-12346-5
always 步子 135-34-5-125-156-1
always 武將 34-4-13-46-5
always 歪曲 2356-3-245-1256-3
always 歸還 13-1246-3-1235-12456-2
always 歸降 13-1246-3-15-46-2
always 死當 15-156-4-145-1346-5
always 死難 15-156-4-1345-1236-5
always 殉難 15-256-5-1345-1236-5
always 殞沒 256-4-134-126-5
always 殺伐 24-345-3-12345-345-3
always 殼子 123-2346-2-125-156-1
always 每行 134-356-4-1235-1346-2
always 比及 135-16-5-13-16-2
always 比比 135-16-5-135-16-5
always 比肩 135-16-5-13-2345-3
always 比鄰 135-16-5-14-1456-2
always 毯子 124-1236-4-125-156-1
always 毽子 13-2345-5-125-156-1
always 氈子 1-1236-3-125-156-1
always 氫彈 245-13456-3-145-1236-5
always 水分 24-1246-4-12345-136-5
always 汗位 1235-1236-2-1246-5
always 汗國 1235-1236-2-13-25-2
always 汗王 1235-1236-2-456-2
always 江都 13-46-3-145-34-3
always 池子 12-156-2-125-156-1
always 沈括 24-136-4-13-35-3
always 沈沒 12-136-2-134-126-5
always 沈著 12-136-2-1-25-2
always 沏茶 245-16-5-12-345-2
always 沒世 134-126-5-24-156-5
